src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-A-póósa_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - poosa - ok : # -m animate noun, dog AEW NA1
     poosa+NA+Sg: poosa
     poosa+NA+Pl: poosiksi
     poosa+NA+Obv: poosi
     poosa+NA+Non: poosi
     
     poosa+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: nitohpoosima
     poosa+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: nitohpoosimiksi
     poosa+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: nitohpoosimi
     poosa+NA+Px1Sg+Non: nitohpoosimi
     
     poosa+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: nitohpoosiminnaana
     poosa+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: nitohpoosiminnaaniksi
     poosa+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: nitohpoosiminnaani
     poosa+NA+Px1Pl+Non: nitohpoosiminnaani

     poosa+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: kitohpoosiminnoona
     poosa+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: kitohpoosiminnooniksi
     poosa+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: kitohpoosiminnooni
     poosa+NA+Px21Pl+Non: kitohpoosiminnooni

     poosa+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: kitohpoosima
     poosa+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: kitohpoosimiksi
     poosa+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: kitohpoosimi
     poosa+NA+Px2Sg+Non: kitohpoosimi

     poosa+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: kitohpoosimoaawa
     poosa+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: kitohpoosimoaawaiksi
     poosa+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: kitohpoosimoaawayi
     poosa+NA+Px2Pl+Non: kitohpoosimoaawai

     poosa+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: otohpoosimiksi
     poosa+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: otohpoosimi
     poosa+NA+Px3Sg+Non: otohpoosimi

     poosa+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: otohpoosimoaawaiksi
     poosa+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: otohpoosimoaawayi
     poosa+NA+Px3Pl+Non: otohpoosimoaawai
     
     PS/sik+poosa+NA+Pl: sikohpoosiksi
